public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dithionario_veneto-1.0.0-windows-xpi/dictionaries/vec.dic
adintar/A
alear/A
inamorar/A
arbitrar/A
dexarmiđar/A
ativar/A
aver/A
xbadajar/A
bakar/A
balkar/A
strabalŧar/A
xbandonar/A
inbaraŧar/A
inbarkar/A
bastar/A
xbatimentar/A
dexbavarar/A
baxukiar/A
xbendar/A
xbetegar/A
xbiankar/A
inbilar/A
inbiondir/A
biskolar/A
rebójer/A
rebokar/A
rebolar/A
inbonbar/A
bordar/A
bortir/A
inbotonar/A
xbraitar/A
dexbramegar/A
xbraŧar/A
brevetar/A
brivar/A
xbroɉar/A
inbroxar/A
brustolar/A
burlar/A
buxarar/A
camar/A
scauŧar/A
scentrar/A
acéñer/A
cetarar/A
scokar/A
dexdir/A
daneđar/A
indentar/A
determinar/A
xdindolar/A
redíxer/A
radolŧir/A
doperar/A
dormenŧar/A
doxar/A
dedúxer/A
đavajar/A
đontar/A
đular/A
ekonomiđar/A
rientrar/A
estínguer/A
exekrar/A
konfar/A
fadar/A
sfalkar/A
fanfruñar/A
sfarinar/A
infaŧendar/A
skarnifegar/A
senplifegar/A
defenir/A
konferir/A
festiđar/A
infiar/A
fiapir/A
infidar/A
refikar/A
sfilaŧar/A
fiorar/A
infiscar/A
flosar/A
infogar/A
folar/A
forar/A
sformar/A
refornir/A
refosar/A
afrankar/A
sfrànđer/A
fraterniđar/A
fregar/A
sfrexar/A
infrolir/A
fruñar/A
ŧentrifugar/A
infumegar/A
fuŧilar/A
dexgaɉar/A
galonar/A
ganbinar/A
inganŧar/A
ingarbuɉar/A
dexgatejar/A
gendoliđar/A
ingobar/A
ingonbrar/A
gorgeđar/A
retrogradir/A
ingrandir/A
dexgranfir/A
gratar/A
ingravidar/A
ingređar/A
grevar/A
griñar/A
xgrixolir/A
ingrosar/A
guar/A
xguaratar/A
xguilŧar/A
dexgusar/A
deidratar/A
industriar/A
ingaxar/A
inpiñatar/A
insular/A
intiriŧir/A
iritar/A
ixolar/A
inɉarmar/A
inɉemarar/A
ɉoŧar/A
kair/A
deskaenar/A
inkaɉar/A
kalivar/A
skalmanar/A
inkalŧar/A
inkamuŧar/A
rekanbiar/A
kanforar/A
skanpanotar/A
inkantonar/A
deskapelar/A
kaponar/A
karatar/A
inkargar/A
skarnevalar/A
inkartar/A
inkartoŧar/A
inkaspar/A
inkatarigolar/A
deskatramar/A
inkaucar/A
skavar/A
akaxar/A
kietar/A
skodegar/A
kojonbarar/A
inkolar/A
skolorir/A
rekoltar/A
komodar/A
inkónber/A
skonfuxionar/A
deskonpañar/A
konseliar/A
kontinuar/A
akonŧar/A
skopelotar/A
okórer/A
deskordar/A
inkòrđer/A
skorniđar/A
inkosar/A
inkotir/A
kovèrđer/A
rekréder/A
rinkréser/A
kriolar/A
deskrostar/A
inkroŧolar/A
rekuadrar/A
inkucar/A
kuèrđer/A
intrakuirar/A
inkular/A
inkuñar/A
skurŧar/A
kúxer/A
xlangorir/A
xlanŧar/A
xlargiđar/A
xlatinar/A
leamar/A
lèđer/A
xlenguaŧar/A
alevar/A
lexierir/A
relievar/A
delimar/A
lisar/A
lokar/A
loŧar/A
perlustrar/A
inmagarar/A
mamalukar/A
xmaniar/A
markar/A
inmarŧir/A
dematar/A
inmaxarir/A
melar/A
xmenuir/A
inprométer/A
mièder/A
misiar/A
xmokolar/A
sormontar/A
xmorbar/A
stramortir/A
mucarar/A
munir/A
mutolir/A
naturaliđar/A
xnervađar/A
nodrigar/A
anular/A
obligar/A
preokupar/A
ontolar/A
organeđar/A
oskurar/A
inpacugar/A
despaketar/A
spalpeđar/A
despanocar/A
inparar/A
straparlar/A
despasar/A
pastroŧar/A
strapaŧar/A
pedalar/A
spelakiar/A
sospénder/A
spentonar/A
perkotar/A
petar/A
spetorar/A
spianar/A
piegar/A
pinŧar/A
despirar/A
piŧar/A
konplikar/A
spolverar/A
konpóner/A
despontar/A
popetar/A
inposesar/A
poxar/A
presostatar/A
inprimar/A
proviđar/A
desputar/A
eradegar/A
deramar/A
rapar/A
realiđar/A
relaŧionar/A
rexiduar/A
riŧolar/A
roejar/A
romatiđar/A
ropegar/A
ruđenir/A
ruskar/A
desagrar/A
desalir/A
insalviar/A
sarkiar/A
scantiđar/A
sekar/A
suseguir/A
konsejar/A
semolar/A
inseñar/A
konservar/A
sfraxenar/A
trasimar/A
asíster/A
skandajar/A
deskarselar/A
skinŧar/A
deskorŧar/A
soraskríver/A
soler/A
asòlver/A
sopođar/A
spalankar/A
ispear/A
spetar/A
spiocar/A
despoɉar/A
sputanar/A
stafilar/A
destañar/A
stikar/A
istituir/A
stornir/A
straŧar/A
strolegar/A
stuar/A
stupinar/A
suɉerir/A
susitar/A
detajar/A
intakar/A
tanburar/A
taređar/A
tastiđar/A
telefonar/A
intendacar/A
atentar/A
deteñir/A
otèñer/A
sostéñer/A
sterminar/A
tinbrar/A
tiviar/A
intonar/A
intorbir/A
tortiɉar/A
intovaɉar/A
strabukar/A
trapanar/A
tratiđar/A
tremolar/A
destrigolar/A
tronkar/A
tuar/A
inŧakolar/A
ŧefar/A
inŧercar/A
reŧetar/A
ŧimolar/A
ŧitar/A
inŧukar/A
urtar/A
vagar/A
rinvangar/A
varkar/A
stravéder/A
velenar/A
xventar/A
reveñir/A
konvèñer/A
vergolar/A
traversar/A
dexvestir/A
dexviar/A
vínŧer/A
vixilar/A
invojar/A
involtar/A
revòlxer/A
sotoxàser/A
xbringar/A
dixerir/A
xɉànxer/A
xñikar/A
xurlar/A
